Washington statutes.
RCW 4.16.005

Commencement of actions.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, and except when in special cases a different limitation is prescribed by a statute not contained in this chapter, actions can only be commenced within the periods provided in this chapter after the cause of action has accrued.

[ 1989 c 14 s 1.]